Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Chapter 20. Mississippi River Timberlands Control Act

§§ 49-20-1 through 49-20-37.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2006, ch. 319, § 1 effective from and after passage (approved March 6, 2006.)

§49-20-1. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]

§49-20-3. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).

§49-20-5. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]

§49-20-6. [Laws, 1995, ch. 322, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 9, 1995).]

§49-20-7. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]

§49-20-9. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]

§49-20-11. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]

§49-20-13. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]

§49-20-15. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 8, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]

§49-20-17. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 9, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]

§49-20-19. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 10, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]

§49-20-21. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 11, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]

§49-20-23. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 12, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]

§49-20-25. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 13, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]

§49-20-27. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 14, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]

§49-20-29. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 15, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]

§49-20-31. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 16, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]

§49-20-33. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 17, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]

§49-20-35. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 18, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]

§49-20-37. [Laws, 1991, ch. 326 § 19, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).]